











	
	 
DOCUMENT DESCRIPTION

SUBMITTED TO:	Delaware North Corporation
SUBMITTED BY:	WNS Global Services
AUTHOR:	Binoy Kar
DATE:	April 27th 2018
VERSION:	V1.6
STATUS	First Version


DOCUMENT REVIEW AND APPROVALS

NAME	PROJECT ROLE	APPROVAL STATUS	DATE
Binoy Kar	Project manager		
			
			
			


DOCUMENT VERSION HISTORY

DATE	VERSION	UPDATE SUMMARY	UPDATED BY
27-April-18	1.1	Draft version	Binoy Kar
03-May-18	1.1	Draft version	Sridhar Pachigolla
07-May-18	1.1	Draft Version	Shaji Naveen
09-May-18	1.2	First version	Binoy Kar
17-May-18	1.3	Updated based on the points discussed during FDD Walkthrough on 15th\16th May 2018	Soumia Nair
23-May-18	1.4	Updated based on the points discussed during FDD Walkthrough on 17th\22nd May 2018	Binoy\Soumia
25-May-18	1.5	Updated based on the points discussed during FDD Walkthrough on 23rd\24th May 2018 and based on Brian’s Feedback 	Binoy\Soumia
31-May-18	1.6	Updated GL Accounting Distribution, Reports, Access & Authentication Process Flow, ERP Failure Queue and other points based on open items tracker  	Binoy\Soumia 

	
Table of Contents
1	INTRODUCTION	1
1.1	Purpose	1
1.2	Scope	1
1.3	References	1
1.4	Glossary	1
2	DELAWARE NORTH AT A GLANCE	2
2.1	Introduction	2
2.2	Delaware North Future State	2
2	REQUIREMENT OVERVIEW	3
3	SOLUTION SPECIFICATION	3
3.1	WNS AP TRAC Solution – Functional Specification	3
3.1.1	Process flow - Manage Inbound documents	3
3.1.2	Process flow -Level 4 – DNC level Interim – Non PO Invoice	4
3.2	Mailroom & Scanning Services	5
3.3	Email [Source 2]	11
3.4	Manual Introduction	13
3.5	OCR Data Extraction	13
3.6	Validation Queue	14
3.7	Processing Queue	20
3.8	Coding queue	23
3.9	Approval queue	26
3.10	Quality check	30
3.11	Invoice Verification queue	32
3.12	ERP Integration	32
3.13	ERP Failure queue:	38
3.14	Job completed queue	39
3.15	Exception Management Process	40
3.15.1.1	Bad image	40
3.15.1.2	Cancel exception queue	41
3.15.1.3	Duplicate invoice queue	41
3.15.1.4	Multiple document Exception	42
3.15.1.5	Return to vendor queue	43
3.15.1.6	Vendor management queue	43
3.15.1.7	Parking Queue	44
4	EMAIL NOTIFICATION	45
5	WORKQUEUE	46
6	ACCESS & AUTHENTICATION	47
7	USER GROUPS AND ROLES	48
8	SEARCH FUNCTIONALITY	49
9	OTHER APPLICATION FUNCATIONALITIES:	50
10	UPSTREAM & DOWNSTREAM INTEGRATION	51
10.1	Inbound Interface Data Structure	51
10.1.1	Org Master Data	51
10.1.2	Currency Master Data	51
10.1.3	Vendor Master	52
10.1.4	GL Code Master Data	52
10.1.5	HR Master Data	52
10.1.6	Approval Matrix Data	52
10.1.7	OU wise coder names	53
10.1.8	Capex budget Master (Not a part of current scope of delivery)	53
10.1.9	PO Header Master (Not a part of current scope of delivery)	53
10.1.10	PO line Master (Not a part of current scope of delivery)	53
10.2	Reference file needs during Dev, Testing, UAT & Prod	53
10.3	Loading, Error Handling of Inbound & Outbound files in SFTP	54
10.3.1	Frequency, Timing & file code of inbound masters	55
10.4	Loading, Error Handling of Inbound & Outbound files in SFTP	57
11	REPORTS	57
12	SYSTEM ARCHITECTURE	61
13	ERROR HANDING MACHANISM	62
14	ASSUMPTIONS & UNDERSTANDINGS:	63
15	BRD ATTACHMENT	65
16	RICEF RELATIONSHIP WITH FDD SECTIONS	65
17	OPEN ITEM TRACKER WITH FDD SECTIONS	68
18	STAKE HOLDERS	68
18.1	Delaware North Stakeholders	68
18.2	WNS Stakeholders	69
19	APPROVAL SIGNATURE PAGE	69

 
1	INTRODUCTION
1.1	Purpose
The purpose of this document is to list down the detailed functional and system requirements for implementation of WNS AP TRAC Solution for catering the Accounts Payable requirement of Delaware North.
1.2	Scope
The project scope includes implementing WNS AP TRAC solution for introducing documents from various sources, processing invoices, exception management, approval management, interfacing into Delaware North ERP Systems. 

The scope of the document is to design the TOBE functional architecture of the Delaware North Accounts Payable System, based on the requirements gathered during due diligence and blue printing phase and cater to technical design.

1.3	References
This information provided in this document has been extracted based on discussions with Delaware North Stakeholders/SME and Process documents shared by Accenture.
1.4	Glossary
Various abbreviations, acronyms and definitions used in this FDD are as follows:

BPM	Business Process Management
DMS	Document Management System
AP	Accounts Payable
QC	Quality Control
SFTP	Secured File Transfer Protocol
TAT	Turn Around Time
UI	User Interface
AP	Accounts Payable
ERP	Enterprise Resource Planning
DOA	Delegation of Authority
GL	General Ledger
PO	Purchase Order
OCR	Optical Character Recognition 
WI	Work item is the unique record that shows up on WNS TRAC Tool
DNC	Delaware North Center
CMS	Case Management solution











2	DELAWARE NORTH AT A GLANCE
2.1	Introduction
Delaware North is a global food service and hospitality company headquartered in Buffalo, New York in the United States. The company also operates in the lodging, Sporting, Airport, Gaming and Entertainment industries. The company employs over 55,000 people worldwide and has over $2.6 billion in annual revenues.
Delaware North is headquartered at 250 Delaware Avenue in Buffalo, New York.
Delaware North began as Jacobs Brothers in 1915 and was founded by brothers Marvin, Charles and Louis Jacobs. The current operating name for the holding company was first used in 1980. Today, the company remains family-owned and operated by Jeremy Jacobs, Sr. and his three sons, Jerry, Jr., Lou and Charlie.
Jeremy Jacobs, Sr. also owns the Boston Bruins. The arena in which the Bruins play, TD Garden, is owned by Delaware North. Jeremy Jacobs, Sr. is also a member of the U.S. Department of Commerce Travel and Tourism Board.
2.2	Delaware North Future State
Delaware North and WNS have endeavored to digitize the Accounts payable platform with the following themes in consideration

•	Digitization of the Accounts Payable process of non- PO invoices
•	Enable centralized system to drive operations excellence

To this extent, WNS and Delaware North conducted workshops to deep down into the current practices within Delaware North and arrived at the “TOBE” state, keeping in mind the current technology landscape and the limitations, if any.  

Features, functionalities, process, procedures, policies were discussed and features and functionalities which need to be enabled within WNS AP TRAC platform were evolved. 

While these were done, there are several action items within Delaware North needs to be enabled either on the process harmonization or the technology side for a successful implementation of the future state. 

Currently, POs are issued via multiple instances of BirchStreet software, by different business units. In some cases, the GRN is being managed in BirchStreet system. In the current scope of delivery, BirchStreet invoices is not factored as per DN instruction. Processing of PO based invoices for BirchStreet will be taken up at later stage following change management process

The following are a few enablement of functionalities from the future state perspective
 
•	Virtually paperless processing environment
•	Multiple Modes of Invoice receipt
•	Front-end scanning, OCR
•	Invoice introduction through email using email import utility
•	Integrated controls for Exception Management
•	GL coding & accounting distribution
•	Approval for Non-PO through workflow
•	File based Integration with Delaware North System (PeopleSoft) 

2	REQUIREMENT OVERVIEW
WNS AP Solution along with Delaware North specific customizations will cater to address the requirements and features discussed during Due Diligence and blueprinting between DN SME and consulting partner Accenture. 

3	SOLUTION SPECIFICATION
3.1	WNS AP TRAC Solution – Functional Specification 
The Below Sections cover each of the process flows in detail, the various logics, business rules that apply for Delaware North
3.1.1	Process flow - Manage Inbound documents



3.1.2	Process flow -Level 4 – DNC level Interim – Non- PO Invoice











3.2	Mailroom & Scanning Services 
 
•	Actor: 
o	DN suppliers for sending invoices into different PO Boxes
o	Ricoh for scanning and provision invoices into WNS SFTP
•	Description:
o	For physical invoices and related documents WNS M&S Partner, RICOH will provide inbound Scanning services through their scanning center at USA Australia & UK. Below table gives summary of PO boxes across separate locations
Sr. No	Country	City	PO Box number	Document Pickup time (local time)	Provision to invoice images into WNS SFTP	Email address
1	USA	Cleveland	TBD	08:00 AM	01:00 PM	TBD

2	Australia	Sydney	TBD	08:00 AM	01:00 PM	TBD
3	UK	London	TBD	08:00 AM	01:00 PM	TBD
4	Canada	Cleveland	TBD	08:00 AM	08:00 AM	TBD




Note – Missing details in the above table will be updated post finalization of scope with Ricoh. It has been agreed with Delaware North Project Max team that WNS's M&S Partner need to setup 1 PO Box for each region i.e. USA, Australia & UK. For Canada additional PO Box will be setup at USA however for Singapore only email introduction will be followed. There will be no separate PO box for Singapore
o	DN suppliers from respective regions will send paper invoices and supporting document in envelop to given PO boxes
o	RICOH will maintain the clean desk policy, i.e. they will scan all the documents collected in a day
o	Ricoh will pick up documents from each PO boxes daily at 08:00 am local time for each region
o	Once the documents are picked up, they will be scanned at local scanning center and provision invoices into WNS define SFTP folder by 1:00 pm local time
o	Below are the possible scenarios for scanning documents coming in one envelop
	One envelop one invoice document: Only one file will be created for the given invoice
	One envelop multiple invoice documents: documents will be sorted as per invoices first before scanning. Each file will be provided for each invoice
	One envelop one invoice with multiple supporting document: Only one file will be created with multiple pages in it
	One envelop multiple invoice with multiple supporting document: Chances for such scenarios will be very rare as per understanding from DN. For the given scenario, scanning team will try their best to classify as per invoices. Multiple invoice files will be provision to WNS. Since it would be manual identification and clubbing supporting document with corresponding invoices, chances of error would be very high. Such cases will be handle as an exception in AP TRAC. There will be system prompt at validation stage if the number of page count is more than 3 so that user can raise “Multiple Page” exception if it contains more than one invoice. Once the exception is raised, the workitem will route to separate queue so that user can download invoice file, split and reintroduce into AP TRAC manually
o	Along with documents, envelop will also be scanned (back side of the envelop where “From “or “Return to” address is mentioned) and attached with each invoice image file
o	Initial pages of the documents will be invoice followed by supporting document and envelop copy
o	Apart from invoices, below treatment will be followed for handing non- invoice documents
	Ricoh will identify invoices & non-invoice documents as a part of sorting activity
	Documents pertaining to P-cards, live checks, W9, 1099 forms, statements and other Non-invoice documents will be FedEx (Using DN FedEx number) to DN office as below
Non-Invoice documents for the UK location will be routed to the UK Head of Finance at the below address:
Attn: Kathy White, Head of Finance 
11th Floor, York House
Empire Ware
Wembley
HA9 0PA
United Kingdom

Non-Invoice documents for Australia location will be routed to the Australia VP of Finance at the below address:
Attn: Andrew Stephens
630 Church St,
Richmond Victoria 3121
Australia  

Non-Invoice documents for the US and Canada location will be routed to Corporate HQ to the Business Services Lead at the below address:
Attn: David Pytak
Delaware North, Global Headquarters
250 Delaware Ave
Buffalo, NY 14202
USA

	All other non-invoice documents will be scanned and move to AP TRAC so that WNS clerk can flag those documents as Miscellaneous
	In case, any documents related to Live checks, P-cards, w9 and 1099 forms are accidently scanned and introduced in to AP TRAC, WNS clerk / AP user will flag such documents with respective sub category and will take necessary action in AP TRAC to intimate scanning partner with the details of image file for FedEx to DN office at their respective location as mentioned above for UK, Australia, USA and Canada. While triggering such email notification, the copy of email will be also send to DN Corporate email box as an intimation.  For such documents which are introduced through email channel, it will be intimated to DN corporate email address
	There will be no workflow rules for handing non- invoice documents in AP TRAC. Post flagging of documents as Miscellaneous, the workitem will move to completed status (with no further action)
o	Once successfully scanned, RICOH will archive hard copies of the documents in warehouse and retain it for a period of 60 days [for Rescans etc.]. Post which they will destroy these documents and provide the proof of destruction to DN for future reference purposes
o	Destruction of documents will take place post approval from DN officials “Brennan Payne” and “David Pytak”. In case of any change in role /non- availability of Delaware North officials, it will be intimated to WNS & Ricoh with alternate SPOC details by Delaware North
o	Once the documents are scanned, Ricoh will place scanned image file into respective folder of WNS SFTP. Separate location wise folder will be created. Example. USA-PO Box number, AUS-PO Box number, UK-PO Box number & CANADA-PO Box number (based in USA)
o	The documents will be scanned in .tiff/pdf format, at resolution 300 DPI, bi-tonal. Specification: TIFF 6.0– 1-bit: Huffman, CCITT Group 3, CCITT Group 3(2D), CCITT Group 4, Pack bits, LZW and no-compression
o	The images will be provisioned in the form of Batches. 
	 Images which will be scanned in Tiff/PDF format, at resolution 300 DPI, bi-tonal. Specification: Huffman, CCITT Group 3, CCITT Group 3(2D), CCITT Group 4, LZW and no-compression
	Images may be single page or multi-page (in a single image) depending upon the document received 
	There will be a Metadata file which will be placed along with the images, i.e., each meta data file will have corresponding relationship of all images in the given batch

	Metadata file will have the details as below
Sr. No.	Field Name	Field Type	Field Length	Example
1	Batch Number	VARCHAR	30	01339046
2	Document Identifier 	VARCHAR	30	12-01-2017WRK1234567890_
01012017_1300.pdf
3	Received/Collection Date & Time	DATE&TIME (MM/DD/YYYY HH:MM:SS)	18	04/28/201614:20:56
4	Image Scan Date & Time	DATE&TIME (MM/DD/YYYY HH:MM:SS)	18	04/28/201614:20:56
5	Scan Operator ID	VARCHAR	25	U261680
6	Source PO Box	VARCHAR	25	7787878
	This data will be stored in the database of the AP system at the time of introduction of image, this will help in rescan cases and must be sent through the email that goes to our scanning partner
	Metadata file will be a Pipe separated file in csv format.


Sample Record Format:

01339046|12-01-2018_DN1234567890_01012017_1300.pdf"|04/28/201614:20:56|04/28/201614:20:56|U261680|7787878
o	Auto Introduction of physically Scanned Images by M&S Partner RICOH to WNS TRAC Tool
	Workflow Auto Scan Introduction Utility will pick up scanned images from the respective folder and will introduce each image after which OCR will run and then it will show up in “Validation Queue”.
	Each image gets introduced in workflow as an individual transaction. Each transaction is designated a TRAC Registration number by workflow which is the unique name in the process
	Miscellaneous documents other than invoices can also get introduced in the workflow.
	Other Document types could be live checks, P-cards, Supplier Statement etc.
	If non- Invoice documents get introduced in the TRAC, user will Index the document in Validation Queue as “Misc.” and will also have option to send intimation to Ricoh to further FedEx hard copies to DN office
o	Auto Scan Utility will pick images from the batch folders to introduce them into Workflow. In case of successful introduction of images into workflow, utility will move the images to ‘Successful’ folder 
o	 In case introduction in workflow fails the images will move to ‘Failed’ folder in WNS SFTP
o	For Failed items the scan utility will send out email to, the WNS operations team and Application support team who will have to work to resolve the items and import them successfully. 
o	RICOH will provide a Daily Summary report to WNS Operations on all scanning activities for reconciliation purpose with the WNS TRAC Tool the next day for all items scanned the previous day
RICOH will provide a Monthly consolidated report to WNS Operations on all scanning activities for reconciliation purpose with the WNS TRAC Tool 1st day of new month contained all documents scanned during the last calendar month
o	Sample format of RICOH Reconciliation Report is mentioned below
Sr. No	Field name	Example
1	PO Box Pick up Date	100084 - 12-01-2017
2	Po Box Number	PO Box - 12345
3	Number of Invoice Received	Fed-Ex - Post Office        253
4	Number of Invoice Processed 	253
5	Number of Envelope Received	Fed-Ex - Post Office        253
6	Number of Envelope Processed 	253
7	Image range 	NPO20171201000001 - NPO201712010000619
8	Image Count	619
9	Time uploaded to SFTP	0.55
10	Destination Path	PO/Invoices/20171201
11	Destruction Date	 
12	Batch#	1



                                        






		       




	Sample format of Daily Scan Report 
                                                                                         
3.3	Email [Source 2]

•	Actor:
o	DN Suppliers sending invoices over email to DN generic email box
•	Description:
o	Delaware North will send a formal communication to all suppliers for sending email with following prerequisites 
o	Attached file to be in PDF / Tiff format only
o	Supporting document to be merged in single file corresponding to one invoice
o	Pages pertaining to invoice should be part of initial pages
o	File size should not exceed more than 5 MB
o	Out of overall of volume of the invoices, approximate 20% volume is estimated to come through email
o	The channel of invoice introduction into AP TRAC for Singapore will be only email
o	Supplier across different regions will send email to DN email ID (dnapinvoicesubmission@delawarenorth.com) 
o	It’s been agreed with Delaware North Corporate team to have 1 New Generic Email Box set up for all BUs
o	AP TRAC email connector will be configured to read and download emails from “Inbox” folder 
o	Email download utility will validate each emails before introduction into AP system. Emails with incompatible file format, secure or embedded emails as attachment will automatically move to sub folders (Secure, Unsupported or Other folder) define in DN email box
o	Any emails which are not getting introduced into TRAC due to issue with attachments, it will be handled by WNS user manually
o	WNS users will have access to DN email box. User will monitor emails in Secure, Unsupported & Other folders in DN mail box. Following are the different scenarios for handling invoices coming via email
o	Incompatible file format – WNS user will manually reply such email to supplier informing about incompatibility 
o	Secure / Password protected – WNS user will download and save the file without secure attributes to introduce into TRAC manually. Post successful introduction, user will move such emails to ERRORPROCESSED folder
o	Embedded emails – WNS user will download attached file and save the file locally to manually introduce into TRAC. Post successful introduction, user will move such emails to ERRORPROCESSED folder
o	Other – Any other scenarios apart from above mentioned, user will download attachment to manually introduce into TRAC. Post successful introduction, user will move such emails to ERRORPROCESSED folder. In case, invoice is failed to introduce through manual introduction, it must be reported to WNS technical team for resolution
o	Email without any attachment- System will automatically move such cases into Error folder. For such cases, no invoice job will be created in AP TRAC since no attachment
o	Note – If invoices are introduce manually following any of the above approach, invoice reconciliation will be performed manually by comparing total number of email failed records comparing with emails in different folders by WNS Operations 
o	Body of email will be added as a last page of invoice document in AP TRAC
o	In case of multiple attachment with valid file format, multiple invoice jobs will be created in AP TRAC
o	Incase email contains attachments with combination of Invoice & supporting document, multiple Invoice jobs will be created in TRAC for each attachment (Valid file). There will be no auto merging of supporting document. Any supporting documents will also introduce as a separate job in TRAC, user will flag it as miscellaneous during validation stage 
3.4	Manual Introduction
•	Actor:
o	WNS processor – introducing invoices manually into AP TRAC
•	Description:
o	Apart from scan & email introduction, system will allow WNS processor to introduce invoices manually
o	In an event where images are not received via Ricoh and it has been sent to WNS users’ DN email Ids for urgent cases, the user can introduce it Manually into AP TRAC
o	For manual introduction, user would need to attach invoice file in PDF/Tiff format
o	User would need to select Invoice type, and Subtype while introducing invoice manually in TRAC
o	Post successful introduction, system will give prompt with unique TRAC registration number for user reference


3.5	OCR Data Extraction 
•	Actor:
o		System steps to perform OCR extraction
•	Description:

o	OCR is the system process to extract invoice Header and line level fields from scanned image. Details of OCR fields mentioned in section 3.6 
o	For Delaware North, as a part of Wave 1 Go-live, we have requested to provide samples of top 50 vendors with 10 samples each for system training. For subsequent waves, if there is a requirement to train additional samples, it will be taken up by WNS with required efforts
o	Once the 500 Images reaches to WNS [or in parts], WNS will start training for OCR to capture the required data for invoice processing
o	At the time of go live when OCR is switched on, Once the scan copy of invoice images is introduced, system will automatically extract the data based on the OCR rules mentioned for each of the fields for the templates trained
o	The data will be extracted from first 3 pages of invoice image. In case the data is extended to remaining pages, user can capture using rubber bending technique
o	The accuracy of extracted data will be based on Printed text with acceptable image quality, DPI and number of invoice samples trained in the system 
o	All documents introduced through any of the channels (Ricoh, Email or Manual) will go through OCR transformation process and details will be extracted and captured in WNS TRAC Tool
o	The Captured Details will be visible to Users in Validation stage for update / rectification



3.6	Validation Queue
•	Actor: 
o	WNS AP Processor will have access to this interface to perform indexing and validation of invoice data
•	Description:
o	After the OCR engine completes its work of data extraction, this will be the first queue which will be visible to WNS AP end users
o	The overall screen will be divided into 2 frames i.e. Image viewer on the right sight and form on the left side
o	The form on the left side will be further divided in to different sections to display details of Document, Vendor, Invoice Header & Line to enhance end user working experience 
o	There will 3 various sources through which data in the fields will be updated in the form
	System: AP TRAC generated data / workflow data points 
	Master: Data from Masters based on defined fetching logic
	OCR:  Data extracted from invoice image
o	System will try its best effort to auto populate data based on business rules and fetching logic (Details mentioned in below table). In case of any error while reading invoice image / incorrect data is captured in the form, system will flag with exclamation (!) sign so that user can rectify same using rubber banding process
o	System will give proactive alert in case page count is more than 3 so that WNS AP processor can take decision to raise Multiple document exception
o	Each document introduced into AP TRAC will be treated as invoice. In case of email introduction, the body of email will have added as a separate page of the document
o	The extraction accuracy of data from invoice image will be based on samples invoices trained in the system along with image quality and DPI.  Below is the field level understanding with corresponding business rules associated to fetch / update data

Sr. No	Field Name	Type	Mandatory 	Source	Business rules
Document details
1	Source	Read-only Text	Yes	System	It will be updated based on the channel of document introduction. In case of PO Boxes, it will be updated as "Location-POBox-Number". In case it i.e. emails same will be updated as Email
E.g. If source is RICOH - "1234-AUS" , "456-US","331- CAN" and "446 - UK" .
If source is Email - " Email"
Note:  For such cases supplier from address will be updated.
If source is Manual - "Manual".

2	Induction Date	Read-only Text	Yes	System	System generated. It will be document introduction date in the system
3	Supplier Email Address	Read-only Text	No	System	If the source is "Email", it will be updated with from email address
4	AP BU
Read-only Text	Yes	Org Master	It will be updated based on OU code
5	AP BUDescription
Read-only Text	Yes	Org Master	It will be updated automatically based on the identification of OU through Org structure mapping table.
6	GL BU
Read-only Text	Yes	Org Master	It will be updated automatically based on the identification of OU through Org structure mapping table.
7	GL BU description
Read-only Text	Yes	Org Master	Based on Org Master
8	Operating Unit code	Editable	Yes	Org Master	Operating unit code will be identified based on Org master l. System will check for "Ship to Address " & "OU name/ Description" mentioned on invoice image to determine Operating unit from Org Master. Incase OU is not found automatically through extraction of "Ship to Address" or "OU name / Description", user will have to use OU lookup functionality to search using location / OU description. It will be wild card search
9	Operating unit Description	Editable	Yes	Org Master	 It will be updated automatically on OU Code
10	Invoice type	Editable	Yes	Manual	By default, it will be non- PO. Depending upon document type, user can select Non- PO / Non- PO-RTV/Non- PO -VM/Non- PO-Parking/Misc. Document (Details mentioned in below table with routing rules)
11	Invoice sub type	Editable	Yes	Manual	By default, it will be Invoice. Depending upon document category, user will select required sub category (Details mentioned in below table with routing rules)
					
13	Zoho Case ID	Editable	No	Manual	It will be applicable only incase invoice subtype selected as "Vendor Issue" / "Hold"
14	Comments	Editable	No	Manual	Mandatory for all Subtypes except "Invoice" & "Credit Memo"
Supplier Details
15	Vendor ID	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Based on the extraction of ""Bill To / Ship To" address & "Vendor Name" from invoice and fetching corresponding data from vendor master
16	Vendor Name	Read-only Text	Yes	OCR / Manual	Extraction from invoice image
17	Street1	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
18	Steet2	Read-only Text	No	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
19	City	Read-only Text	No	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
20	Region (State, Province, County)	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
21	PostalCode	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
22	CountryKey	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
23	TelephoneNumber	Read-only Text	No	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
24	FaxNumber	Read-only Text	No	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
25	SetBookCurrency	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
26	VendorPayCurrency	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
27	ContactName	Read-only Text	No	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
28	Email	Read-only Text	No	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
29	VendorSetID	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
30	StatusFlag	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
31	Terms	Read-only Text	Yes	Vendor Master	Fetch from vendor master
32	Persistence	Read-Only Text	Yes	Vendor
Master	Fetch from vendor master. The value will be Onetime / Normal There will be no validation rules for Onetime vendor in AP TRAC. It will be displayed for user to know about one-time vendor. The validation rules for one-time vendor will be in Peoplesoft
Invoice Header
32	Reference PO	Editable	No	OCR / Manual	Note : Reference PO will not be updated in PO Number field, it will be updated in user defined field in PeopleSoft This are all OCR extracted fields.
- Incase PO number is available on invoice image, system will update PO number automatically however invoice type will be selected as "Non PO"
- There will no relation with PO number and Invoice type 
- For other fields, it will be extracted from invoice image and system will also give flexibility to edit / rectify using rubber banding technique for errors
- There will be system validation for Invoice subtotal + Tax + Freight = Invoice total. If any of the field is not available, user will update as 0.00
33	Invoice Number	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	
34	Invoice Date	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	
35	Currency	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	
36	Capp ID	Editable	No	OCR / Manual	
37	Invoice Sub total	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	
38	Tax	Editable	No	OCR / Manual	
39	Freight	Editable	No	OCR / Manual	
40	Invoice total	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	
Invoice Line details
41	Invoice line number	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	These are all OCR extracted fields.
- It will be extracted from invoice image. There will no validation of such details during validation stage. It will be available for coder for accounting distribution. Any error in line description or total will be updated by coder manually. No rubber feature will be available in coding interface

42	Description	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	
43	Line total	Editable	Yes	OCR / Manual	


o	Invoice / document routing rules based on the selection of Invoice type and subtype 
o	Incase job is submitted without any exception type, it will route to Coding queue directly based on OU updated for invoice. System will automatically check for duplicate while storing data into system database and will route it to processing queue for user to follow Duplicate check exception process. Below are the routing rules based on the selection of Invoice type and Subtype

Invoice type	Invoice Sub type	Comments/Routing	Destination queue
Non-PO	Invoice	Non-PO Invoice
Coding
Non-PO	Credit Memo	Credit Memo	 Coding
Non-PO	Rescan	No Indexing Needed, Depending upon source of invoice introduction, email notification will differ. If the source is email, it will go to from email address.  Incase email id is noreply@xx.com, it will go to DN corporate email id. Incase source is Ricoh, it will go to Ricoh email ID	Job completed
Non-PO-RTV	1)  Missing Document
2) Incorrect Invoice Calculation
3) Missing required Data
4) Invoice Billed to Different Company
5) Other	Return to Vendor if email id is available, else to DN Corporate default email ID	Job completed
Misc. Docs	Retained	Depending upon source of introduce following action will be taken. 
If the source is Ricoh, an email will trigger to Ricoh with CC to DN default email ID. In case the source is email, it will trigger to  DN email ID	Job completed
Misc. Docs	Live Check	Depending upon source of introduce following action will be taken. 
If the source is Ricoh, an email will trigger to Ricoh with CC to DN default email ID. In case the source is email, it will trigger to  DN email ID	Job completed
Misc. Docs	P-Card	Depending upon source of introduction following action will be taken. 
If the source is Ricoh, an email will trigger to Ricoh with CC to DN default email ID. In case the source is email, it will trigger to  DN email ID	Job completed
Misc. Docs	Vendor Statements	Depending upon source of introduction following action will be taken. 
If the source is Ricoh, an email will trigger to Ricoh with CC to DN default email ID. In case the source is email, it will trigger to DN email ID
Vendor statement recon process will be outside AP TRAC.
It will be done by WNS AP processor by comparing statement with PS data
	Job completed
Misc. Docs	Others	For All Non- Invoice Documents which will be marked, the flow ends here- Ops will download and work on it	Job completed
Non-PO	MultiDoc	If multiple invoices come in one WI - will get routed here for splitting and re-introduction	Multiple document exception
Non-PO	Cancel	Workitem will be discarded and no further action can be taken	Job completed
Non-PO- VM	1) Missing Vendor
2) Vendor setup needed
3) Vendor Maintenance 	Route the workitem to Vendor management queue	Vendor Management queue
Non-PO-Parking 	


1) OU cannot be determine 
2) Other	Route the workitem to Parking queue (any issue with Org master, items to be placed in the hold queue)	Parking queue










o	Below prototype of validation interface
  

 

3.7	Processing Queue
•	Actor:
o	WNS AP user 
•	Description:
o	Post Submitting workitem in validation queue, invoice jobs will route to this queue if system identifies as Duplicate. System will automatically compare Invoice number, Invoice Amount, Vendor ID and OU in the database for the given invoice. If all 4 fields match, system will flag invoice as duplicate.  WNS processor will follow duplicate exception handing process (Mentioned in section 3.15.1.3)
o	Incase case of any error with invoice header and line level details, user may route the invoice back to validation queue for necessary rectification but in case of any error / mismatch with invoice number, vendor details or OU, system will allow to modify such fields in processing interface itself
o	There will be no selection of coder at this stage. It has been agreed with Delaware north that all invoice will be routed to Coder group at OU level
o	Apart from validation queue, below are the different queues from where invoice job can come to this queue
	Validation
	Coding
	Approval
	Quality
	Invoice verification
	ERP failure
o	Apart from duplicate exception, WNS AP user can also raise other workflow exception from processing queue. Below list of exception and routing logic




Exception Type	Sub Exceptions	System steps	Routed queue	Next queue
Duplicate	NA	Incase invoice is flagged as duplicate; the exception will be raising to move workitem to supervisor queue for final decision whether to process the invoice or move it to cancel queue	Duplicate exception queue	Cancel Exception / Processing queue
Vendor Issues	Missing Vendor	Any issues with vendor details on invoice comparing with vendor master or vendor details not available in AP TRAC database, the exception will be raised. While raising such exception, it is mandatory to update Zoho case ID to ensure case is logged to handle such cases outside AP TRAC. Based on the resolution received in Zoho case, user would take decision in AP TRAC whether to route it to processing queue or keep it in same queue	Vendor Management Queue	Processing queue / Cancel queue
	Vendor setup needed			
	Vendor Maintenance 			
Multiple document exception	NA	In case there are multiple invoices in same document, the exception is raised to route the workitem to Multiple document exception queue so that user can download such document, split is manually and reintroduce into AP TRAC	Multiple document exception queue	Job Completed
Parking	Approver missing	Incase approvers chain is not available or any of the approver is missing / status is inactive, this exception will be raised to park the invoice till approver is updated in AP TRAC. While raising such exception, Zoho case ID would be mandatory field to ensure proper follow up with DN team outside AP TRAC for approver update	Parking Queue	Approval
	1) OU cannot be determine
2) Coder Group not found
4) Other
 	Any other unknown issue identified during validation and processing queue due to which invoice processing is not possible / cannot move to next step, user can move it to parking queue	Parking Queue	Validation / Processing

o	Below prototype for processing interface



3.8	Coding queue
•	Actor:
o	DN users from different BU
•	Description:
o	Every invoice in AP TRAC will go through coding process
o	Delaware North will provide list of coders corresponding to each Operating Unit (in WNS format). During Go-Live, DN will provide consolidated list of all coders as onetime data. Any changes / addition in the list will be provided to WNS as per define intervals (mentioned in master data list)
o	It has been agreed with Delaware North that, Invoice will be routed to OU wise coder group. Each user having access to the group will have access to invoice for coding
o	Coder group will be created at operating unit level
o	Routing of invoice to Coding group will be based on OU mapped for given invoice job during validation stage
o	Each DN user (Coder) will login into AP TRAC system to perform coding activity
o	Each invoice line can be coded with different accounting distribution
o	As per Delaware North, there are 12 accounting segments. It will be coder responsibility to choose right segments while coding. Below is GL coding distribution tree

       GL Accounting Distribution: 

     

o	Following Coding rules will be applied
•	GL Business Unit is the Operating Unit Parent
•	Operating Unit is the Department Parent.
•	There is no parent for the GL Actual Accounts in PeopleSoft.
•	The account selected at time of coding (e.g., COS) requires a Product Code to be keyed. There no parent to the product code list in the GL.
•	The account selected at time of coding (e.g. Notes Payable Other) requires Affiliate BU.
•	The Affiliate BU is the Affiliate OU Parent.  The Affiliate BU selected will determine the valid Affiliate OU’s.  Note the OU selected cannot match the OU initially selected for processing the payable.
•	The Account selected at time of coding requires a Project ID.  The GL Business Unit is the Project ID parent.
•	The Project ID requires an activity to be keyed.  The Project ID Is the activity parent.
•	PCBU may need to be keyed in.  Will be available but is not mandatory.  The PCBU will always match the GL BU selected.
•	If an asset box is checked (account 122710), then the AMBU, Profile ID and Quantity must be keyed. The AMBU will always match the GLBU.  This will only occur for international locations that do not utilize PMWEB.
•	There is no parent for Profile ID.
•	There is no parent, the quantity is a freeform field to be populate to properly record the asset in AM.
•	The Analysis Type (GLE) and Category (e.g., Profit Generating) are setup in PeopleSoft configuration and will not need to be configured in AP TRAC
o	As per business requirement, user will be allowed to split single invoice line to multiple line to code with different accounting distribution
o	User will be allowed to merge multiple invoice line to code with accounting distribution
o	System will extract Invoice line level details and same will be made available to coder for accounting distribution. In case of any error, coder will rectify by referring invoice image
o	Invoice line level details will be validated by coder. Any error in the line description/ missing extraction of details will be rectified by coder manually before distributing accounting segments. In case of any exception to be raise or error in invoice header level details, the coder will have flexibility to route invoice to Processing queue (as coder doesn’t will not have any right to raise exception)
o	Note – There will be no invoice line level verification / rectification at validation stage by WNS AP user. It will show up directly in coding interface. Incase, extraction is not done, coder will manually add line level details
o	System level validation will be defined at line level. Total of split lines i.e. child cannot be than original line i.e. parent.  Once the lines are split, user would need to manually update amount field and do distribution. System level validation will be only on total of split lines with total of parent line 
o	In case of wrong coding and same is rejected by Approver, the workitem will route back to coding queue. Coder will have flexibility to change / rectify the accounting distribution and resubmit
o	In case of error while splitting single line with multiple line with incorrect coding, once it is rejected by Approver, system will allow coder to delete the split lines and code the original line
o	Outbound file from AP TRAC to interface with PeopleSoft will contain coding distribution as done during coding stage. i.e. it will contain only the split lines not the original line
o	System will provide functionality to apply single GL code to multiple lines or each line with different code 
o	Incase Goods are not received, Services are not received or some clarification is required by Buyer which is not updated in DN system, coder will have option to keep the invoice on Hold by selecting Check box “Hold” with mandatory selection of Hold reason in Dropdown and mandatory comments
Hold Reasons in dropdown will be as follows:
•	Goods not received
•	Service not received
•	Clarification required from Buyer
o	Putting on hold during coding stage will not move Invoice Job to Parking queue. It will still be on coding queue with a flag as hold so that coder can verify the same once the data is updated in DN system
o	To track this, coder user will keep monitoring the coding queue with flag status as “Hold”
o	System will automatically trigger email notification once in day (Timing to be confirm) intimating invoices pending for coding in coding queue 
o	System will automatically trigger escalation email to controller group after 72 hours of invoice job pending in coding queue (Current date & time less activity start date & time). Post 72 hours, system will trigger same escalation every after 24 hours
o	Details of Controller group email IDs for each OU is yet to finalized by DN
o	OU wise coder will be responsible for coding which is identified at Invoice header level. In case, the invoice is corporate invoice, it can be further routed to specific Department group of Retained services by OU wise coder
o	Routing process of invoices for handing Corporate invoices is as follows:
-	Additional Department wise groups will be created only for Business services retained organization to access coding queue
-	Separate user mapping will be maintained for these groups. DN will provide list for department wise user mapping 
-	Invoices, once it is introduced will be indexed with  OU ,  GL BU , AP BU based on Ship to address/OU name / description mentioned on the invoice  
-	After validation / Indexing, Invoice will route to coding queue as per OU indexed at header level
-	There will be option in coding interface to route the invoice to Business services department group by Coder with mandatory comments
-	User having access to the group, will perform coding by choosing required chart fields as per GL master and data shared by DN 
-	In case the invoice is wrongly routed to department, user can route it back to Processing queue 
-	User will have an option to route to department group from processing queue so that it can be re-routed to same group rather than taking route from Coding





















Below is the prototype for coding screen 
 

Following Table will depict Relationships, Source, Provider and Frequency of different GL Business Units: 
Data Fields 	Parent 	Source 	Provider 	Frequency 
GL Business Unit Code	None 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
GL Business Unit Description 	None 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Affiliate Business Unit Code *	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Affiliate Business Unit Description *	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Project Costing Business Unit ('PCBU') Code* 	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Project Costing Business Unit ('PCBU') Description*  	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Asset Management Business Unit ('AMBU') Code* 	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Asset Management Business Unit ('AMBU') Description* 	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Operating Unit 	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Operating Unit Description 	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Affiliate Operating Unit Code* 	Affiliate Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Affiliate Operating Unit Description* 	Affiliate Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Department Code	Operating Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Department Description 	Operating Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Account Code 	None 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Account Description	None 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Product Code 	None 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Product Description 	None 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Analysis Type	None 	N/A	N/A	N/A
Category 	None 	N/A	N/A	N/A
Project ID 	GL Business Unit 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Project Description	None 	GL Master 	IBM 	Daily 
Profile ID 	None 	NA	DN	One time
Quantity *	None 	N/A	N/A	N/A
				
Other mapping
Tabs 	 	Source	Provider 	Frequency
Accounts Payable ('AP') Account Master 	 	GL Master 	IBM 	Monthly 
Accounts number with type mapping (Cogs / Assets/Intercom)	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Accounts requiring a product 	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Accounts Requiring Affiliates 	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Accounts Requiring a Project  	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Boston Combinations requiring a project 	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Boston Operating Unit Account combinations requiring a project 	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Products not allowed for B4XXX	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Products not allowed for B3XXX	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Products not allowed for B5XXX	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 
Products not allowed for B6XXX	 	Manual	Delaware North 	Monthly 


Below Attachment will describe in detail about each Data Field 
 


  
3.9	Approval queue
•	Actor:
o	Delaware North users at Department and BU level (Invoice value less than equal to 100k user will be at Department level and if the amount is more than 100 k, it will at BU level)
•	Description:
o	Every invoices processing in AP TRAC will undergo approval process
o	Once coding is completed, system will automatically route the invoice job to approver / approvers queue and will also trigger email notification intimating invoice is pending for his/her approval
o	The logic for invoice routing to Approvers will be based on Approval matrix and invoice dollar value. Currency master will be used to convert invoice amount to a dollar value. Example. If the invoice value is in GBP, system will automatically covert GBP to USD as per rate defined for the given date range in comparing invoice date in the currency master to identify right approver
o	There will be multiple levels of approvals depending upon invoice value and invoice currency and approval matrix. As per discussion with Delaware north, there will be 2 sets of approvers i.e. approver less than equal to 100k invoice value and approve above 100k invoice value
o	Approver less than equal to 100k invoice value will be as per department & approver above 100k value will be as per Business unit (AP unit)
o	Approver will be identified based on Department and BU updated in GL coded segment from the first line of invoice
o	DN will provide consolidated approval matrix as one-time master during production implementation and same will be share on weekly basis as per changes. The master will be provided as per agreed WNS format
o	First level of approver would always require to login into TRAC to approve the given invoice
o	Approver from level 2 onwards will be allowed to approve invoice over email. Once the invoice is approved by first approver, an email will be trigger to second approver with a link in the email body to Approver / Reject. Invoice document will be also attached for such emails
o	All approvers will be part of TRAC user list and same also needs to part of DN AD user list
o	Depending upon decision either Approve / Reject, system will update status in TRAC based on registration number & From address to avoid someone approving invoice on the forwarded email 
o	In case the decision is Approved, it the work item will move to next queue i.e. Quality Check / Invoice verification queue
o	In case, decision is Reject, the work item will route back to coding queue (Last coder)
o	In case, invoice is rejected by second approver, it will move to coding queue. Once coder resubmit, it will flow all levels of approval again
o	Once the invoice is routed back to Coding queue, coder can either rectify the accounting distribution and resend it for approval or can route back to processing queue in case there is error in captured invoice / supplier details
o	Below is the list of possible scenarios with required processing steps

Scenarios	Processing flow
All Approvers chain found as active while completing coding process	Invoice will move to next step for approval
Any of the approvers found to be inactive while completing coding process	1) System will give prompt stating "Approver level (system update) not found" so that user can route case back to processing queue to raise exception
2) WNS processor will raise parking exception with sub category as "Approver not found" with necessary comments and log a call in Case management system (CMS) 
3) Once the case is close in CMS, user will complete job in the parking queue. System will automatically check if the approver chain is found with active status. If yes, it will automatically route to approval queue bypassing coding process.  incase approver status is still inactive, it will be in same queue with necessary prompt "Approver not found" so that user can take necessary action outside AP TRAC by following up with AP TRAC support and DN technical team for necessary updating 
2nd Approver turns to be inactive after approving invoice by 1st approver	1) There will be not auto routing of WI to other approvers incase approver found to be inactive after approving by first approver. It will be handle manually by verifying aging report and assign the WI to other approvers belongs to same BU
2) Once the WI is approved by assigned approver, it will take original approvers chain for next approver

Note - Separate groups will be created for level 1 & 2 and users will be assigned so that supervisor from DN will allocate WI if approval is pending however same will be available to original approver. The action taken first by approver will be treated as final status in AP TRAC
2nd Approver found to be inactive while approving by 1st approver	1) System will route the WI automatically to Processing queue with Queue status as "Approver not found" so that user can raise exception to move it to Parking queue
2) WNS processor will raise parking exception with sub category as "Approver not found" with necessary comments and log a call in Case management system (CMS) 
3) Once the case is close in CMS, user will complete job in the parking queue. System will automatically check if the approver chain is found with active status. If yes, it will automatically route to approvers from whom approval is pending and continue with rest of the approvers bypassing initial approvers. Incase approver is still not found; the WI will be in same queue with necessary prompt "Approver not found" so that user can take necessary action outside AP TRAC by following up with AP TRAC support and DN technical team for necessary update of approver 
Invoice pending with active approver/s	1) There will be no auto escalation of WI to other alternate approvers. It will be handle manually by verifying aging report and assign the WI to other approvers belongs to same Dept. / BU
2) Once the WI is approved by alternate approver, it will take original approvers chain for next approver


Note - Separate groups will be created for level 1 & 2 and users will be assigned so that supervisor from DN will assigned WI if approval is pending
Level 2 approver approved over email 	Approval decision will be updated in AP TRAC and Invoice Job will move to next queue
Level 2 approvers approved by login into system	Status gets updated in system and Invoice Job moves to next queue
Level 2 approvers approve over email but due to system issue the status is not updated in TRAC	No change in the approval status. It will be in the approval queue till it is approved in system or over email again
Level 2 approvers approve over email but due to system issue the status is not updated in TRAC and action taken once again by login into system 	Only the first action will be considering as final approval decision. Incase email status is not updated and user approved in the system directly, it will be considering as final decision.
Invoice rejected by level 1 approver	Invoice Job will route back to coding queue
Invoice rejected by level 2 approvers	Invoice Job will route back to coding queue. Once coder resubmit the WI, it will follow complete chain of approvers

o	Incase approver has already approved in the given chain and later the user is set to inactive, no action will be taken
o	As per DN requirement, there will be custom interface to review and take decision of multiple invoices at the same time without opening invoice jobs one after another. The access to mass approval screen will be allowed only to first approver
o	System will automatically trigger email notification once  in day (Timing to be confirm) intimating invoices pending for his approval. This is applicable for both levels of approval
o	System will automatically trigger escalation email to controller group after 72 hours of invoice job pending with approver (Current date & time less activity start date & time)
o	Details of Controller group for each OU to defined by DN (Open)
o	Prototype for mass approver screen
  


3.10	Quality check
•	Actor:
o	WNS QC Analyst
•	Description:
o	As per agreement with Delaware North, only 10% of Invoice Jobs will move for Quality Check
o	QC user will only have access to this queue. QC will be performed as per checklist mentioned below to make decision either to ‘Pass’ or ‘Fail’
 
S. No	QC Checklist
1	OU Description
2	Vendor ID
3	Invoice Number
4	Invoice Date
5	Invoice Amount
6	Invoice Currency
7	Tax Amount
8	Freight
9	Lines Data

o	While selecting fail status for any checklist items, it will be mandatory select failure reason code as mentioned below.
S. No	Field	Reasons
1	OU	Wrong OU Selected
2	Vendor ID	Wrong Vendor Considered
3	Invoice Date	Wrong Invoice Date Entered
4	Invoice Number	Wrong Invoice # Entered
5	Invoice Amount	Wrong Invoice Amount Entered
6	Invoice Currency	Wrong Currency Selected
7	Tax Amount (if any)	Wrong Tax Amount Entered
8	Line Data	Wrong Line Data Entered
9	Freight	Wrong Freight Amount Entered








o	Failure of one item in the checklist will be consider as overall QC failure for the invoice
o	If even 1 item has been marked as fail, the WI will move to “Processing Queue” with status of “QC Fail”
o	If everything is Pass, the WI will move to “ERP Interface Queue” or “Invoice verification queue”
o	Once the rectification of done for the failure cases, it will undergo all stage of invoice processing and will also qualify for quality check
o	Following editable fields will be present in QC screen

FIELD NAME	FIELD FORMAT	LENGTH	MANDATORY	EDITABLE	NOTES/DESCRIPTION
Pass/Fail	CHAR/ Dropdown	4	Yes	Yes	Dropdown:
•	PASS
•	FAIL
The default value will be ‘Blank’; QC team needs to select the value from the dropdown.
Reason for failure	Dropdown	100	Conditional		QA will select the value from the dropdown when the above field is selected as “Fail”.

When ‘Pass’ is selected, this field will be disabled
Comments	VARCHAR	256	Optional	Yes	





3.11	Invoice Verification queue
•	Actor:
o	WNS AP Supervisor / Lead

•	Description:
o	Once the invoice is approved / Passed from Quality check queue, system will check for invoice value. If the Invoice value is greater than equal to 100 K, the Invoice Job will automatically route to this queue
o	Only WNS AP supervisor / lead will have an access to this queue
o	Supervisor will review the invoice details and take decision either “Approve” or “Reject”
o	In case the decision is “Reject”, the Invoice Job will route back to processing queue which can further route to validation queue for necessary rectification
o	Once the issue is rectified at processing / validation stage, it will again follow standard processing steps i.e. Coding  Approval  QC / Approval  Verification queue
o	Once the invoice is approved by Supervisor, it will route to ERP Integration queue for generating outbound file to integrate with PeopleSoft

3.12	ERP Integration 
•	Actor:
o	WNS Operation users

•	Description:
o	This will be the final steps for invoice processing in AP TRAC. It will be a system process and doesn’t require any human intervention
o	Once the invoice is approved or passed in Quality check and approved by Supervisor from verification stage, an outbound file in CSV format (|) pipe separated will be generated for each invoice Jobs and placed in WNS SFTP folder (Folder structure to be define) 
o	The details captured from invoice header & line level with GL coding segments, vendor details will be sent to PeopleSoft as outbound interface file. There is no scope for any currency conversion and change in accounting data for invoice processing as it will be handled in PeopleSoft. Below are the details of invoice outbound interface file fields



Sr. No	Fields 	Description
1	ERP_ID	Default Value Always
PS000 (DN ERP ID Code)
2	RegistrationNumber	Registration from WNS AP Tool [AP Tool# generated#
3	ReferencePO	Reference PO
4	ORIGIN	Origin 
(By default it will WNS)
5	VCHR_SRC	Voucher Source
(By default it would be WNS)
6	INVOICE_ID	This is Header Value Only, and will come with capture Invoice Number from AP Tool

7	INVOICE_DT	This is Header Value Only, and will come with capture Invoice Date from AP Tool.
Required - MM/DD/CCYY
8	VENDOR_SETID	Vendor SetID
9	VENDOR_ID	Vendor ID
10	GROSS_AMT	Gross Invoice Amount  
11	SALETX_AMT	Sales Tax Amount
12	FREIGHT_AMT	FREIGHT AMOUNT
13	CURRENCY_CD	Invoice Currency
14	BUSINESS_UNIT (AP Business unit)	AP Business unit
15	BUSINESS_UNIT_GL	GL Business Unit
16	OPERATING_UNIT	Operating Unit
17	DEPTID	Department
18	ACCOUNT	ACCOUNT
19	PRODUCT	Product 
20	PROJECT_ID	Project Id 
21	ACTIVITY_ID	ACTIVITY ID
22	BUSINESS_UNIT_PC	PC Business Unit 
23	Asst_Prof_ID	Asset profile ID
24	Aff_BU	Affiliate BU
25	Aff_OU	Affiliate OU
26	DESCR	Line Description
27	MERCHANDISE_AMT	This is Line Value Only, and will come based on Indexed Values from AP Tool
For Header it will be Blank
For Line it will contain value

o	Invoice interface data will be created in the form of batches. Each batch will have multiple invoice files. As per agreement with Delaware, the files will be created every after 4 hours starting from 10:00 am EST. standard file naming convention will be followed i.e. PS_Posting_yyyymmdd_hhmmss.CSV
o	This queue doesn’t require any manual intervention. Once the output file is generated and provision in defined WNS SFTP path, it will get automatically pulled by DN script every after 4 hours stating from 12:00 pm EST to interface with PeopleSoft case of any error while generating output file from AP TRAC into WNS SFTP folder, an email will be triggered from AP TRAC to WNS application support team for corrective action

o	In case of any error while pulling file from WNS SFTP folder, PeopleSoft import program will trigger email notification to DN and WNS stakeholders and will retry to pull details for posting
o	Once the invoice outbound files are successfully interfaced with PeopleSoft, an acknowledgement file will be generated from PeopleSoft and provision in WNS SFTP for interfacing back to WNS AP TRAC for updating voucher status
o	In case of any error while posting invoice in PeopleSoft, an acknowledgement file will be updated with error description for updating error details in AP TRAC
o	On interfacing PeopleSoft acknowledgement with error description will automatically route workitem to ERP failure queue in AP TRAC
o	Below is the list of fields of acknowledgement file from PeopleSoft
  
Sr. No	Fields 	Description
1	ERPID	DN ERP ID Code
2	RegistrationNumber	The Registration# which belongs to WNS AP Tool for reference
3	PeopleSoft Voucher#	This will be the actual voucher ID which Gets posted in DN eventually
4	DateofVoucher	Accepted into PeopleSoft (mm/dd/yyyy)
5	VoucherErrorMessage	PS error description
/6	Postingstatus (Yes/No)	Final posting status after voucher creation

o	WNS AP users will keep track of workitems in ERP failure queue. For such cases, WNS AP processor will have a visibility of PeopleSoft failure description undated in TRAC so that WNS processor will login into PeopleSoft and take necessary action to rectify error in PeopleSoft. Details of ERP failure queue is mentioned in below section  
o	Once the voucher is successfully created in PeopleSoft, an acknowledgement file with voucher details will be interface with AP TRAC via WNS SFTP. Successfully update of voucher details in AP TRAC will change the status of the job as “Ready for archival”
o	Post successful update of voucher details, AP TRAC will automatically extract invoice images with supporting document and place it into define SFTP folder with control file both for invoice and non-Invoice documents so that AWS utility can pull those images and create hyperlink and pass it to PeopleSoft. Below is the list of fields of control file from TRAC to AWS

o	
Sr. No	Fields 	Description
1	ERPID	DN ERP ID Code
2	RegistrationNumber	Unique Registration number of TRAC
3	InvoiceNumber	As per Invoice image capture during validation
4	InvoiceDate	As per Invoice image capture during validation. MM/DD/YYYY format
5	VendorNumber	As per vendor master
6	VendorName	As per vendor master
7	APBU	As per invoice header updated during validation
8	GLBU	As per Coding
9	OU 	As per Coding
10	DEPT	As per Coding
11	VoucherID	Voucher number updated in TRAC from PeopleSoft
12	VoucherDate	Voucher creation date received from PeopleSoft into TRAC
MM/DD/YYYY
13	FileCreationDate	File creation date by AP TRAC
MM/DD/YYYY
14	FileName	System generated file name for all invoices and supporting document
o	
o	
o	
o	
•	
•	
o	WNS AP TRAC is compatible with PDF/TIFF/DOC/RTF format, hence user will be allowed to attach only compatible file format as a part of supporting document during various stages of invoice processing. Such documents will be extracted and stitched with invoice image while generating files for archiving in AWS
Note – Though system support another format as mentioned above but OCR is compatible only with Tiff / Pdf format only
o	Integration between AP TRAC with PeopleSoft and AP TRAC with AWS will be based on TRAC Registration number as unique identifier
o	
o	Once the documents are pulled from WNS SFTP, it will be archive in Delaware AWS repository. There is no scope for archiving document in WNS Document management system
o	Post successfully archived documents in AWS, an acknowledgement with success status (both for invoice and non-Invoice documents) will be send from AWS to AP TRAC in CSV file (Pipe separated). Once acknowledgement is updated in AP TRAC with success status, the status of invoice job will change to Job completed and relative documents will be purged from AP TRAC after 60 days. In case the status is updated with Error, it will undergo error handing/exception handing process until status changes to Success. During this interim period, status of the job will be “Archival error” Below are the list of fields for acknowledgement file from AWS to WNS AP
	
o	
Sr. No	Fields 	Description
1	ERPID	DN ERP ID Code
2	RegistrationNumber	Unique Registration number of TRAC
3	IntefaceDate	Integration date when AWS pulled files from WNS SFTP
4	InterfaceStatus	AWS archival status (Pass / Fail)
5	ErrorDescription	If fail, error details
o	
o	For integration between WNS AP TRAC with PeopleSoft & AWS, once the output file is picked up by DN system, the copy of the files will be moved to archive/successful folder within WNS SFTP (Structure will be defined in Technical specification document) 
o	The integration between AP TRAC to PeopleSoft & AWS and vice versa will take place with standard file naming convention.  Following would be the file naming rules for different integration points
o	
Sr.no	Integration point	File type	format	Source	Destination	File naming convention with example
1	Outbound data from AP TRAC 	Invoice data	CSV (|) & Txt	AP TRAC	PeopleSoft	PS_Posting_YYYYMMDD_HHMMSS

PS_Posting_20180420_203012.csv - Image file
PS_Posting_20180420_203012.txt - Control file
2	Inbound from PeopleSoft with posting status	Invoice data posting acknowledgement	CSV (|) & Txt	PeopleSoft	AP TRAC	VoucherAck_YYYYMMDD_HHMMSS

VoucherAck_20180420_213012.csv 
VoucherAck_20180420_213012.txt 
3	Outbound Invoice image file from AP TRAC post receiving voucher details from PeopleSoft	Invoice Image file	PDF & Text	AP TRAC	AWS	AWS_Inv_Img_YYYYMMDD_HHMMSS

AWS_Inv_Img_20180420_092011.pdf
AWS_Inv_Img_20180420_092011.txt
4	Acknowledgement from AWS post archiving invoice images	Acknowledgment file from AWS	CSV & Txt	AWS	AP TRAC	AWS_Ack_Inv_Img_YYYYMMDD_HHMMSS

AWS_Ack_Inv_Img_20180420_092011.pdf
AWS_Ack_Inv_Img_20180420_092011.txt
4	Outbound non- invoice image file from AP TRAC to AWS	Non- Invoice document	PDF & Text	AP TRAC	AWS	AWS_NonInv_Img_YYYYMMDD_HHMMSS

AWS_NonInv_Img_20180420_092011.pdf
AWS_NonInv_Img_20180420_092011.txt
5	Inbound acknowledgement from AWS post successful archival of non-invoice image	Acknowledgement from AWS 	CSV (|) & Txt	AWS	AP TRAC	AWS_Ack_NonInv_Img_YYYYMMDD_HHMMSS

AWS_Ack_NonInv_Img_20180420_092011.pdf
AWS__Ack_NonInv_Img_20180420_092011.txt
Below process map depicts different integration points between PeopleSoft, AWS and AP TRAC 



3.13	ERP Failure queue:
•	Actor:
o	WNS AP user
•	Description:
o	In case of any failure while posting invoice into PeopleSoft, based on the acknowledgement from PeopleSoft with error description the workitem in AP TRAC will route to ERP Failure queue
o	 There are multiple scenarios through which workitem will route to ERP Failure queue. Details explain below
	
	Once the processing is complete in AP TRAC, Invoice output file will be generated and provision into WNS SFTP for importing into PeopleSoft
	If there is any pre-edit error, depending upon type of error code / description, it will resolve in PS either by WNS AP users or DN Retained Organization team
	There will be no acknowledgement or automated email notification from PeopleSoft for Pre-edit error cases. It will be responsibility of WNS AP user to login into PS every 4 hours and check for Pre-edit errors. Depending upon type of error, it has to be resolved by WNS. WNS AP user will login into PS interface and rectify such errors. In case the error to be resolve by DN, WNS AP user will intimate to DN Corporate retained group manually via DN email address (Group email id to be provided by DN) outside AP TRAC
	In case of any error during voucher built process, the acknowledgement file will contain voucher number with error description and posting status as “No”. Once the acknowledgement is updated in AP TRAC, the invoice job will move to ERP failure queue. WNS AP user will have following options depending upon error description updated from PS. 
•	Chatfield Combo editing errors - This issue will fixed in PS without reprocessing. Hence user will choose option as “Error rectification” from dropdown in ERP failure queue and resolve issue in PS manually
•	Gross amount does not match line amount/Distribution amount – In case of this issue WI will be  reprocessed  in AP TRAC by routing it back to processing hence user will choose option as “Route to Processing” in ERP Failure queue
•	Distribution missing - – In case of this issue WI will be  reprocessed  in AP TRAC by routing it back to processing hence user will choose option as “Route to Processing” in ERP failure queue
•	Duplicate – For such cases, WNS AP user will intimate DN Retained services group via DN email id outside AP TRAC and flag such invoice as “Error Rectification” in ERP failure queue
Once user submit workitem by taking necessary action in ERP failure queue, the workitem will move out from ERP failure queue as per route defined

Note- For each of the above cases, comments will be mandatory in ERP failure queue

	For the cases which are resolved in PS directly, there will no new invoice file created from AP TRAC however, system will wait for new acknowledgement from PeopleSoft with posting status as “Yes” to route the workitem to document archival process. For the cases where invoice is route back to Processing from ERP failure queue, it will go through all stages for invoice processing i.e. Processing ->Coding à Approval -> QC / Invoice verification à ERP Integration
	On receiving new acknowledgement from PeopleSoft with posting status as "Yes", the workitem will route to job completed automatically without human intervention



•	Below logic will be used for generating outbound files as per different TRAC status code
TRAC Status code	File generation (Yes /No)
Ready for ERP 	Yes
Exported status to PS	No
Error Rectification	No
Failed in ERP	No

   






		Below attachment process map depicts WNS AP TRAC – PS Error Handling Process 
                                                                                                
3.14	Job completed queue
•	Actor:
o	System step
•	Description:
o	This is a hidden queue in AP TRAC. Once the invoice processing is completed, it gets automatically routed to this queue
o	No user will have access to this queue since no further action is expected once the job is completed
o	The details of this queue are only used for reporting purpose to check the number of jobs completed and in pending status out of total jobs introduce into TRAC
o	Valid invoice document which gets process through various stages get completely only after receiving of voucher acknowledgement with success status and movement of invoices images into AWS. In case of non-invoice documents, it gets completed on submitting in validation stage itself
o	Following the different exceptions through which workitem moves to completed queue directly
	Cancel exception
	Bad image exception
	Multiple document exception 
	Return to vendor
	Duplicate exception (if supervisor takes decision to cancel)
3.15	Exception Management Process
Exception matrix 
Exception name	Available in Validation	Available in Processing
Bad image	Yes	No
Cancel	Yes	Yes
Duplicate	Yes	Yes
Multiple document	Yes	Yes
Return to Vendor	Yes	No
Vendor Management	Yes	Yes
Parking	Yes	Yes







3.15.1.1	Bad image
o	Actor: 
	WNS AP Processor & Ricoh scanning team
o	Description:
	Bad Image exception can be raised either from validation queue only
	If the invoice image is illegible and needs a rescan due to which it is not possible to process it, user can manually raise “Bad Image” exception 
	As the user raises this exception, an email notification will be trigger from workflow to Ricoh scanning partner (Email address to be updated). Depending upon PO box, the notification will be triggered to respective scanning center of Ricoh (Australia, USA, UK or Canada)
	The email will have details of image file along with copy of image as attachment
	This exception is applicable only for documents introduced through “Scan” i.e. from Ricoh (Scanning partner)
	In case, the document is introduced via email, system will trigger email notification to the address from where initial email was received. Incase email is noreply@xx.com, email will trigger to DN corporate email ID
	Though the chances of such scenario would be very rear in case of manual introduction, in case it is identified, WNS AP user would follow up with suppliers / DN outside AP TRAC system
	Once the email is triggered from workflow, the workitem will move to completed status
	Based on the email from Workflow, Ricoh will rescan the document and place it into WNS SFTP to introduce as fresh Workitem in AP TRAC

3.15.1.2	Cancel exception queue
o	Actor:
	WNS AP user
o	Description:
	Cancel Document exception can be raised in Validation and Processing Queue
	If WNS user finds that the document is a duplicate or wants to cancel the processing of the document due to invalid documents, statements, letters and any other business reasons, he/she can manually raise “Cancel Document” exception.
	Once the cancel exception is raise, workitem will be discarded and move to job completed status following document archival process in AWS
	No email notification will be sent for this exception

3.15.1.3	Duplicate invoice queue
o	Actor:
		WNS AP processor & supervisor
o	Description:
o	Duplicate check is one of the core validation while submitting invoice details in validation queue. System will automatically compare Invoice number, Invoice Amount, Vendor ID and OU in TRAC database for the given invoice. If all 4 combination matches, system will flag invoice as duplicate and route it to processing queue 
o	WNS AP user will raise this exception in processing queue and workitem will route to Duplicate invoice queue
o	WNS AP supervisor will have access to this queue to take a final decision based on research in PeopleSoft / DN systems
	Supervisor can either take decision to process the invoice by flagging invoice as “No duplicate” which will route workitem to Processing queue if the decision is “To cancel”, system will send email notification to vendor following RTV route and workitem will move to job completed status following document archival process in AWS Incase vendor email address not found in vendor Master, system will send email to DN corporate email id

Note: Duplicate check functionality in AP TRAC is basically Partial check for duplicates subject to availability of data in AP TRAC database. System will not check for any duplicate for the invoice which are interfacing with PeopleSoft from other sources i.e. EDI, Excel upload etc. 

3.15.1.4	Multiple document Exception
o	Actor:
	WNS AP User
o	Description:
	Once the invoice document is loaded in validation interface, system will automatically check for page count to display message for Multi page document. If page count is more than 3, system will show prompt so that user can act to raise multi page exception  
	Multiple document exception can be raised in Validation and Processing queue
	User will raise exception by selecting invoice type as “Non- PO” and Subtype as “Multi Doc”
	Once the exception is raised, it goes to Multiple document exception queue which will have access to only to set of WNS AP users
	To handle this exception, AP user will download document in local share drive, split the document using (PDF Splitter) and reintroduce manually into AP TRAC
	While splitting the document, user will follow standard file naming convention as TRAC Registration incremental number (depending upon number of split files). Example- If the file name is abc.pdf which contains 3 invoices, 3 files will be created. Each file should be name as DN0000000000001_1.pdf,DN0000000000001_2.pdf,  DN0000000000001_3.pdf
	Once the file is split and reintroduce, the original job in the exception queue will be completed which will move it to Job completed status following document archival process in AWS
	Since splitting and reintroduction of invoice documents into AP TRAC will be manual, there will not be any system control on multiple jobs also reconciliation of multiple jobs against original documents will be based on file naming convention followed by user
	It should be part of communication to supplier by Delaware North to provide single file for each invoice who is sending invoice via email

3.15.1.5	Return to vendor queue
o	Actor: 
	DN Supplier
o	Description:
	Return to Vendor, exception can be raised only from Validation Queue.
	If WNS Processor finds that the document invoice cannot be processed and needs to be return to vendor, he/she will raise this exception
	System will send an email notification to the Vendor (if the email ID is present in the Vendor master) along with copy of invoice image as attachment. Incase vendor email address is not found, email will be send to default Corporate DN email ID (Email ID to be confirm by DM)
	Email notification process will be automatic through backend job. Email will be send from noreply@delawarenorth.com
	Once the email is triggered from AP TRAC to vendor / DN user, the workitem will move to completed status following document archival process in AWS. Based on the response from vendor with updated invoice copy, new workitem will be created in AP TRAC

3.15.1.6	Vendor management queue
o	Actor:
	WNS Vendor Management user
o	Description:
	Any missing information (i.e., missing vendor, one-time vendor) / issues identified with vendor details, user will raise exception either from validation or processing to route it to vendor management queue
	While raising vendor management exception, it will be mandatory to update Zoho case id so that user can track action in Case management
	It will mandatory to update invoice header a while raising vendor management exception
	Set of WNS users responsible to handle this queue will perform vendor maintenance activity in DN system and route invoice to processing queue in AP TRAC
	Once the data is updated in DN system, it is expected to get updated master in the next day so that user in the processing queue can search the updated vendor to process further






3.15.1.7	Parking Queue
o	Actor:
	WNS AP Processor
o	Description:
	Any invoices which cannot be processed due to missing master details, Org structure, missing coder/group, Approver a user will raise this exception to move workitem to parking queue until the details are updated and good to process in AP TRAC
	User can raise this exception from validation queue by selecting required invoice Type and subtype
	This exception can also be raised from Processing queue
	While raising this exception, it is mandatory to update Zoho Case ID to ensure that case is logged with case management system for resolution of the hold cases
	Set of WNS AP user will have access to this queue also at the same time they will keep watch of case in Zoho desk. Once the case is closed with resolution in Zoho desk, user will take necessary decision in AP TRAC exception handing queue
	Process of handing exception cases if Approver or anyone in the chain of approver is not found through Parking queue
•	While submitting workitem in coding step, system will automatically check for approver chain. If anyone is not available, it will give prompt to coder so that coder can route the Workitem to processing queue with necessary comments
•	WNS AP user will raise exception to Park such workitem by logging call in Zoho Desk and update ticket number in AP TRAC while raising exception
•	Once the resolution / response is updated in Zoho desk and case is closed, WNS AP user will route the workitem from Hold queue to Approval queue. While routing the workitem, system will automatically check if the chain of approver is available. In case it is not available, it will not allow user to move it to approval queue. For such exceptional scenarios, WNS AP user will follow up with AP TRAC support team outside system. Incase approver is found, system will route to approval queue
	Process of handing workitem if vendor details are missing or vendor not found 
•	Incase vendor details not found or vendor not found due which invoice processing is stuck
•	WNS AP user will raise exception to park such workitem by logging call in Zoho Desk and update ticket number in AP TRAC while raising exception
•	Once the resolution / response is updated in Zoho desk and case is closed, WNS AP user will route the workitem from parking queue to validation queue to update supplier details and process further
•	If Invoice currency is not a part of 5 approved currencies of Delaware North i.e. USD, CAD, AUZ, SGP & GBP, WNS AP user will move the invoice job to parking queue by raising ticket in Zoho desk. For such cases supplier are being paid via wire transfer before posting of invoice. Once the Zoho ticket is updated with resolution, Invoice job in TRAC will move to processing queue for further processing to interface into PeopleSoft 


4	EMAIL NOTIFICATION
•	System will be configured to trigger email notification during different events of invoice processing. The details of all events mentioned in below table

Sr. no	Invoice Sub Type	Use Case	Trigger Point	When	Template to Use	Email from	Email To
1	Rescan	Rescan	Validation Queue	On Exception Submit	Template 1	noreply@ap.delawarenorth.com	TBD.  There will be different email address based on location 
2	RTV	RTV Exception	Validation Queue	On Exception Submit	Template 2	noreply@ap.delawarenorth.com	
							
3	Live check	Live Check	Validation Queue	On Exception Submit	Template 3	noreply@ap.delawarenorth.com

4	Retained	Misc. Doc's	Validation Queue	On Exception Submit	Template 4	noreply@ap.delawarenorth.com

5	Outsourced	Misc. Doc's	Validation Queue	On Exception Submit	NA	NA	 
7	Invoice/Credit Note	Main Coder Email	As per Frequency - Daily 2 Times (Timing to be confirm by DN)	Once Coder ID is identified	Template 5	dnapquery@delawarenorth.com	As per DN HR master 
8	Invoice/Credit Note	Main Approval Email	As per Frequency - Daily 2 Times (Timing to be confirm by DN)	Once Approver ID is identified	Template 6	dnapquery@delawarenorth.com	As per DN HR master 
9	Invoice/Credit Note	Main Approval Email	As required	Once Approver ID is identified	Template 7	dnapquery@delawarenorth.com	As per DN HR master 
10	Invoice /Credit Note	Escalation for coding	After 72 hours	After 72 hours if invoice is pending for Approval	Template 8	noreply@ap.delawarenorth.com	OU controller group Master
11	Invoice /Credit Note	Escalation for coding	After 72 hours	After 72 hours if invoice is pending for coding	Template 9	noreply@ap.delawarenorth.com	OU controller group Master

o	Notification to be trigger as per attached email template
 
List of email address with its purpose for AP TRAC system


5	WORKQUEUE
•	It is the user interface for each queue of invoice processing in AP TRAC
•	The workitem / invoice jobs in workqueue will be listed in FIFO logic so that user can pick oldest job first for processing
•	The fields in the workqueue enables user to filter Invoice jobs based on certain user define conditions. Following will be the standard workqueue fields for each stage




Sr. No	Validation 	Processing / QC / Coding / Approval	Exception 	Processing / ERP Integration / Failure queue
1	Activity Name	Activity Name	Activity Name	Activity Name
2	Registration Number	Registration Number	Registration Number	Registration Number
3	Introduction Date	Introduction Date	Introduction Date	Introduction Date
4	Source	AP BU	AP BU	AP BU
5	From email address	AP BU Description	AP BU Description	AP BU Description
6	File name	GL BU	GL BU	GL BU
7	 	GL BU Description	GL BU Description	GL BU Description
8	Activity SLA	Operating Unit ID	Operating Unit ID	Operating Unit ID
9	Assigned To	Operating Unit Description	Operating Unit Description	Operating Unit Description
10	Job ID	Vendor ID	Vendor ID	Vendor ID
11	 	Vendor Name	Vendor Name	Vendor Name
12	 	Activity SLA	Activity SLA	Activity SLA
13	 	Assigned To	Assigned To	Assigned To
14	 	Invoice Number	Invoice Number	Invoice Number
15	 	Invoice Amount	Invoice Amount	Invoice Amount
16	 	Invoice Date	Invoice Date	Invoice Date
17	 	Job ID	Job ID	Job ID
18	 	Last actioned user	Last actioned user	ERP Integration start date
19	 	Invoice type	Invoice type	Voucher Number
20	 	Invoice subtype	Invoice subtype	Postable status
21	 	Zohocase ID	Workqueue status	Voucher creation date
22	 	Workqueue status	Exception type	Workqueue status
23	 	Hold status	Exception subtype	 

6	ACCESS & AUTHENTICATION
o	Below process flow depicts AP TRAC access and authentication flow

	Authentication will take place using SAML Endpoint
	WNS Users
	Users accessing the AP TRAC from WNS network will be redirected to DN AD login page 
	Once the user enters Delaware North AD credentials, they are successfully authenticated and gets to the 2-factor authentication page
	User enters the soft token on Delaware North 2-factor authentication page
	SAML Assertion will be sent from DN ADFS to AP TRAC for further processing in application
	Delaware North Users
	Users accessing the AP TRAC application from DN network will be redirected to DN 2-factor authentication Page
	User enters the soft token on Delaware North 2-factor authentication page
	SAML Assertion will be sent from DN ADFS to AP TRAC for further processing in application
	Authorization will take place in AP TRAC based on role/ group assigned to individual user




 

7	USER GROUPS AND ROLES
•	Description
o	Different groups will be created for each queue for different BU/OU
o	Each user can be assigned to multiple groups and hence can have access to multiple queues
o	Depending upon the user role and kind of activities expected to perform in AP TRAC the access will be control through distinct groups
o	Scan introduction & Validation group will be at system level not as per BU/OU since org structure will be assigned to invoice job after completion of validation stage

o	Below table gives details of Roles with corresponding queues


Activity/Queue	Who	Roles
		WNS APClerk	WNS APSupervisor	WNS VM Team	WNS QC Team	DNC Coder	DNC Approver	DNC Retained
ScanIntro [Manual]	WNS	X	X	 	 	 	 	 
Validation Queue	WNS	X	X	 	 	 	 	 
Processing Queue	WNS	X	X	 	 	 	 	 
WNS Hold Queue	WNS	X	X	 	 	 	 	 
MultiDoc Queue	WNS	X	X	 	 	 	 	 
Potential Duplicate Queue	WNS	 	X	 	 	 	 	 
ERP Interface  Queue	WNS	 	X	 	 	 	 	 
ERP Failure  Queue	WNS	 	X	 	 	 	 	 
Coding Queue	DNC	 	X	 	 	X	 	 
Approval Queue	DNC	 	X	 	 	 	X	 
Vendor Exception Queue	WNS	 	X	X	 	 	 	 
Quality Control Queue	WNS	 	X	 	X	 	 	 
Invoice verification queue	WNS	 	X	 	 	 	 	 
Search Tab	WNS&DNC	X	X	X	X	X	X	X
Reports 	WNS&DNC	 	X	 	 	 	 	X


8	SEARCH FUNCTIONALITY
•	Description:
o	It will be separate module to search and retrieve invoice details and to view documents
o	Each role will have access to search interface
o	Document / invoice search will be allowed only with multiple filters except with unique identifier. This will ensure minimum load on system database and smooth functionality
o	User will also have an option to download invoice document from search interface
o	Invoice data will be available for search till it is purged from system. Data purging. Policy is yet to be decided by Delaware North
o	Since there will no Document management repository for AP TRAC, images will not be archived within WNS. Once the voucher acknowledgement is successfully undated in TRAC, invoice documents will be provision to DN through WNS SFTP to archive in AWS
o	As per agreement with Delaware North, the documents will be purged from TRAC database after 60 days of job completion (Invoice job moves to Job completed status)

Indicative Screen Shot below- will be customized for Delaware North Data

9	OTHER APPLICATION FUNCATIONALITIES:
•	Listing of Invoice job in in FIFO logic i.e. older item will appear first for processing
•	ability to assign Invoice jobs to other users by supervisor group
•	Custom filters in different workqueue as per user preference
•	Ability to search Invoice jobs in different workqueue 
•	Automatic hiding of Invoice job for other users in case it is open for processing by user
•	All the invoice jobs will be made available in the work queue. Only authorized users will have access to define queue. Depending upon the activity SLA status, user would require processing invoices
•	User friendly job status in workqueue for easy identification of last actioned activity
Comprehensive Audit log with end to end life cycle of invoice processing

10	UPSTREAM & DOWNSTREAM INTEGRATION 
The below section explains the requirement, usage, ownership and format of data to be exchanged between the ERP Systems of Delaware North and WNS AP Solution for seamless transformation and functioning of future state model.
10.1	 Inbound Interface Data Structure
Inbound Interface Data in the proposed solution will be the data that will be provisioned from the Delaware North ERP Systems (PeopleSoft) and Consumed by WNS AP TRAC. Based on the nature and usage of the data, the inbound interface data is further categorized mentioned in below section
All the below files, inbound & outbound will need headers fields, and will have to come as .csv extension with “|” as the separator Structure of inbound and outbound file is mentioned in section 10.3.1

10.1.1	Org Master Data
	Org master is the base for AP TRAC functionalities and workflow routing logic
	It is used to define users’ roles / groups
	Org structure of DN will be define in 3 levels i.e. GL unit >> AP Unit >> Operating unit level
	The frequency of the master will be very minimal. It will be updated as per the change at organizational level (Details mentioned in below section)
	Before Go-live, the entire structure will be configured in the system with current mapping
10.1.2	Currency Master Data
	It is a currency mapping master with corresponding DN supported currencies & conversion rate
	There is no scope for Invoice currency conversion as it will be done directly in PeopleSoft
	The currency master in AP TRAC will be used to identify approver 
	The frequency of the master will be monthly (i.e. Day+1 when currency master is updated in PeopleSoft)
	For the First Load, the feed will contain exchange rates for the last 6 months to ensure any back dated invoices be processed with the respective exchange rates as on the invoice date
	WNS TRAC Tool will import this and keep it in a table, and new month’s records will be added to the table

10.1.3	Vendor Master
•	Vendor master will have generic details like name, address Remit To details and Terms
•	The master will be used as a reference table to populate vendor details in AP TRAC 
•	The vendor identification logic will be based on extraction of vendor name and address with lookup on vendor master 
•	First extract will be full dump of Active Suppliers, and as per frequency decided to get incremental data of supplier [New or Changes]


10.1.4	GL Code Master Data
•	This master will use as a reference table to select right GL code with accounting distribution for coding of invoice
•	As per discussion with Delaware there are 13 segments (GL BU, OU, Dept, Account, Product, Project ID, Activity, PCBU, AMBU, Profile ID, Quantity, Affiliate BU & Affiliate OU) for accounting distribution
•	It is agreed with Delaware North & IBM team that, one-time data with all Chart of accounts combination mapping will be provided to WNS and incremental changes / additional to be provided as per frequency defined below section

10.1.5	HR Master Data 
•	Users who will login into AP TRAC to perform Coder, Approvers & retained organization roles of Delaware North will be provided in structured format to store in AP TRAC system
•	The data will be extracted from DN Active directory at a regular interval with status of users (Active / Inactive)
•	This will also have email address field for users to trigger email notification during various event as per business requirement
•	First extract with complete list of DN active users will be provision to WNS before Go-Live and going forwarded updated master with changes /deletion/ additions will be provided as per agreed time intervals
 
10.1.6	Approval Matrix Data 
•	This will be used as a base for identifying approver as per invoice value
•	The source of the master data will be manual. Delaware north corporate team will create data manually as per WNS format and share with WNS to import into AP TRAC system.  (DN to confirm on the SPOC for WNS to coordinate). The structure of the master data is incorporated in the below specification file
•	It is used for approval of non- PO invoice
•	The frequency of the master will be very minimal. It will be updated as per the change at organizational level. 


10.1.7	OU wise coder names
•	The master will be used as a base to filter coder names as per operating unit defined at invoice header level
•	Mapping of OU wise Coder will be provided by DN team at regular intervals
•	First time mapping will be provided by DN team for configuring live system and as per frequency decided, it will manually create and provided to WNS to update in TRAC
10.1.8	Capex budget Master (Not a part of current scope of delivery)
•	This master is not applicable in the current scope of delivery. 
Note – Currently validation for Cap ID against budget master is not part of AP TRAC scope. If Cap ID is mentioned in invoice, it will be updated at invoice header field so that WNS AP user can login into DN system for budget verification before processing invoice 
10.1.9	PO Header Master (Not a part of current scope of delivery)
•	This master is not applicable in the current scope of delivery
10.1.10	PO line Master (Not a part of current scope of delivery)
•	This master is not applicable in the current scope of delivery

10.2	Reference file needs during Dev, Testing, UAT & Prod
•	In Principle agreement that WNS will need extracts for all Master data feeds (automated from PeopleSoft) and manually created by DN 
•	Before development commences Delaware North to give us Sample data of at least 25 records each in all files
•	Delaware North & IBM team will perform First time extract full dump for all files and as per frequency Incremental data
•	This Data must be saved in WNS SFTP folder structures defined for the purpose with scheduled time intervals with the agreed file naming convention mentioned 
•	Required by Delaware North
	Data files technical and functional structure
	SFTP path for exchanging files along with frequency and schedule of each file
	User name and password to connect to SFTP server – DN will require 1 ID’s for System
	Folder path for placing various Master data & file naming convention
	Folder path for placing Invoice acknowledgement
	Pickup path for invoice details from WNS SFTP
	Pickup path for invoice image files from WNS SFTP

•	Required by WNS
	Testing instance of PeopleSoft
	Sample data feeds for all master for testing
	Invoice samples for OCR configuration
	Prod Data feeds before at least 1 week before go live
10.3	Loading, Error Handling of Inbound & Outbound files in SFTP
•	The loading of data must be according to the times agreed between Delaware North & WNS, in case some delays happen and multiple files are available at the same time, the load Order must be used to determine which file will have to be loaded first 
•	Agreed to have a control file with every new file that Delaware North or WNS will generate
•	If there is no data from previous extract date, an empty file with one blank record will be sent with no data in it to maintain continuity
•	Delaware North & WNS will exchange an Email Distribution list for all or each file type. When a failure even occurs, the appropriate Email Distribution people must be informed to take corrective action.
•	It was agreed that if files are loaded, a log file will be created to show which records have failed to load. And this information will be shared with the other party, based on file type corrective action will be taken
•	Corrective action could be resending the full file or sending the failed records merged with the next day’s processing file
•	For any issues with the file from DN, WNS team to log a call JIRA (DN application) for resolution




10.3.1	Frequency, Timing & file code of inbound masters
Below table depicts the Frequency & Timing at which each of the files will be exchange between WNS and DN


S.No	Source	Source System	Master Data Type	Master File CodeName	Frequency	File content	DNC Time	WNS Program
1	DNC	People Soft	Organization Master	Orgmas	1 Per Month	Golive: Full
Ongoing: Incremental	First Hours of WD 0 of New month new file is going to come.	10:00 AM EST (TBD)
2	DNC	People Soft	Currency Master	CurrMas	Day 0+1 after updating in PS
Golive: Last 12 Months
Ongoing: Last month	First Hours of WD 0 of New month new file is going to come.	9:30 AM EST (TBD)
3	DNC	People Soft	Vendor Master	VendorMas	1 Daily	Golive: Full
Ongoing: Incremental	6AM EST	8:30 AM EST
4	DNC	People Soft	GL Code Master	GLCode	1 Daily	Golive: Full
Ongoing: Incremental	7AM EST	9:00 AM EST
5	WNS	TRAC - AP Tool	Invoice Outbound File	PS_Posting	6 Time Daily	All New Transactions Only	Every 4 hours starting at 09 AM EST	Every 4 hours starting at 08 AM EST
6	DNC	People Soft	Voucher Acknowledgement	VoucherAck	6 Time Daily	All New & Errors corrected Transactions 	Every 4 hours starting at 11 AM EST	Every 4 hours starting at 12 PM EST
7	WNS	TRAC - AP Tool	Image Outbound File	AWS_Image	6 Time Daily	All New & Erros corrected Transactions 	Every 4 hours starting at 03:00 PM EST	Every 4 hours starting at 02:00 PM EST
8	WNS	AWS	Image Acknowledgement-AWS	PostAckFailure	3 Time Daily	All New Images sent	Every 4 hours starting at 04:00 PM EST	Every 4 hours starting at 4:30 PM EST
9	DNC	AD	HR Hierarchy Master	HRH	Once per day	All list of users to be part of TRAC users for the first time. Going forward it will be as per request registered in Jira	6AM EST	9:00 AM EST
10	DNC	JIRA	Approval Access & Matrix	AppMat	Once per day	Manually created master as per WNS format during Go-Live after which it will flow through Jira	As it comes	TBD
11	DNC	JIRA	Coder Access	Coder	Once per day	Manually created master as per WNS format during Go-Live after which it will flow through Jira	As it comes	TBD


Appended Inbound Outbound file structure

 

10.4	Loading, Error Handling of Inbound & Outbound files in SFTP
•	The loading of data must be according to the times agreed between Delaware North & WNS, in case some delays happen and multiple files are available at the same time, the load Order must be used to determine which file will have to be loaded first 
•	Agreed to have a control file with every new file that Delaware North or WNS will generate
•	If there is no data from previous extract date, an empty file with one blank record will be sent with no data in it to maintain continuity
•	Delaware North & WNS will exchange an Email Distribution list for all or each file type. When a failure even occurs, the appropriate Email Distribution people must be informed to take corrective action.
•	It was agreed that if files are loaded, a log file will be created to show which records have failed to load. And this information will be shared with the other party, based on file type corrective action will be taken
•	Corrective action could be resending the full file or sending the failed records merged with the next day’s processing file
•	For any issues with the file from DN, WNS team to log a call JIRA (DN application) for resolution 

11	REPORTS 
•	The Reports Access will be available based on requirement. Existing AP TRAC Reports will be configured to generate statistical report based on the data residing in the AP system
•	Reporting access will be giving only to WNS Supervisor and Delaware North Retained organization users
o	Below is the list of custom reports to be built in AP TRAC

Sr. No	Report Name	Description	Frequency	Audience
1	Input Reconciliation Report	This Report will present details of invoice documents introduced through different channels (Ricoh / email / Manual) against number of jobs created in AP TRAC for the given period	Daily	WNS Operations
2	Exception Report	This Report will generate details of all work items pending in different exception queues	Daily	WNS Operation & DN Retained organization user for Bad image / Rescan report
3	Coding Aging / Cycle Report	This Report will present list of invoice jobs in AP TRAC which are pending for coding along with Aging in days and Cycle time	Daily / As per requirement	DN retained users & WNS Operations
4	Approval Aging/ Cycle Report	This Report will present list of invoice jobs pending with Approvers along with aging in days and cycle time	Daily / As per requirement	DN retained users & WNS Operations
5	Voucher Acknowledgement Report	This Report will present list of invoice jobs for which voucher detail updated against invoices interfaced PeopleSoft	Daily / As per requirement	WNS Operations & DN Retained users
6	Open Invoices Report	This Report will present list of invoice jobs pending in different queues of invoice processing but not yet posted in PeopleSoft / pending in ERP integration. The generated data can be used for month end Accruals. It will include all Invoice jobs from Validation, Processing stage, Approval/ QC, Invoice verification and ERP Integration queue	Daily / Monthly	WNS Operations
7	Invoice Processing - Timeline/ Invoice Processing Cycle Time	This Report will present list of completed invoices with processing cycle time excluding time for interfacing with PeopleSoft & AWS	Daily / As per requirement	DN Retained users & WNS Operations
8	No. of Invoiced for Rescan	This Report will present list of work items flagged as Rescan by WNS AP user from validation queue	NA	NA
9	% Invoice Receipt Type	This Report will present list of all jobs flagged with different document types to calculate percentage of each type against total jobs created in AP TRAC	 As per requirement	DN Retained users
10	% Non-Compliant Invoices 	This Report will present list of jobs which cannot be processed and invoice is need to send to Vendor for correction (including invoices for which RTV exception is raised)	As per requirement	DN Retained users
11	Invoices Processed per FTE	This Report will present activity /work step wise user name who has completed/worked on the given activity. 	Daily / As per requirement	DN Retained users & WNS Operation
12	Invoice Processing - Quality/ Invoice Processing Accuracy	This Report will present list of all invoices which are failed in QC or error in voucher creation.	As per requirement	DN Retained users & WNS Operation
13	Invoice Job Processed	This Report will present total number of invoice jobs moved to completed status in a given period. 	Daily / As per requirement	DN Retained users & WNS Operation
14	Accrual report	Covered in report no. 6	NA	NA


Report specification document attached
 





o	Sample layouts for reports
	Exception Report - 1

	Activity Open items report




		Invoice processing cycle type

	Invoice processing accuracy report


o	Other features –
	Multi filters to fetch record
	Exported into XLS & CSV format
	Ability to change charts and graphs at user interface




12	SYSTEM ARCHITECTURE

 

	KTA Web/App Server /License Server – Application UI is hosted on the webserver. All the Kofax services are also hosted on App server including license server.
	Transformation Server – Kofax transformation module is hosted on this server.
	Reporting/Analytics Server / SQL Server – Reporting Server and database server used for the application.
	SharePoint Server – SharePoint DMS for JE TRAC platform is hosted on this server

13	ERROR HANDING MACHANISM
•	Inbound Integration (DN system to AP TRAC)
o	Any error while importing master into AP TRAC, an automated email will be trigger to DN and WNS distribution list (Distribution list to be finalized)
o	Separate folder will be maintained in WNS SFTP folder for handing error cases. If any file failed to import into system, the original master will be moved to error folder with error log file
o	WNS support team will perform initial analysis of the issue based on error logs and work towards resolution. In case it is identified the cause due to incorrect file format / corrupt file / issue with data, WNS support team will coordinate with DN technical team for resolution
o	Once the issue is resolved, DN technical team will provide new master file for the same extract to upload into AP TRAC system
o	In case of importing coder details and Approval matrix, WNS s team will coordinate with DN operation team to get revised data to re-upload into system
•	Outbound integration (AP TRAC to DN System)
o	In case of any issue while importing invoice data due into PeopleSoft an email will be trigger to DN and WNS distribution list (Distribution list to be finalized)
o	PeopleSoft Technical team will perform initial analysis of the issue and work towards resolution. In case it is identified the cause due to incorrect file format / corrupt file / issue with data, PeopleSoft team will send email to WNS technical support team (WTS.AppSupport@wns.com)  
o	Once identifying the actual cause, WNS technical team will regenerate invoice data for interfacing with PeopleSoft

o	Below diagram depicts integration owner for error handing

Note – Distribution list will be updated once it is finalized by Delaware North and WNS Ops team.


14	ASSUMPTIONS & UNDERSTANDINGS:
•	The solution specification has been drafted based on the understanding and requirement gathering session held at Delaware North office from 2nd April to 27Th April 2018. 
•	Current design is to cater the processing requirement of non- PO invoices in AP TRAC
•	Processing of PO based invoices is not part of current scope of delivery. Once BirchStreet system is live, there will be separate discussion and requirement gathering process of handing PO based invoices in AP TRAC
•	Any change in the existing propose design post sign-off, will undergo change management process
•	Sections related to mailroom & scanning is updated based on the requirement capture during process discovery phase. Details of the section will be further updated at later stage. Any conflict in the requirement will have impact in the scope as well
•	Overall AP TRAC functionality will be based on inputs of different Masters from PeopleSoft and other DN system. It is agreed and confirm that all required masters will be provided as per agreed time intervals
•	40 concurrent user’s licenses have been factored at a part of Wave 1 delivery. Additional license will be procured as per future requirement
•	DN will provide complete set of master data by mid of development phase to verify and start with unit testing. The sequence of data to provide to WNS as a part of SIT and UAT
•	Any additional invoices which does not cover the volume of top 50 vendor with 10 samples each for OCR training to be provided by DN. If there is a requirement to train additional samples apart from top 50 vendors, it will be taken up by WNS with required efforts
•	Extraction of Invoice header and line level details will be based on invoice samples trained in the system. The extraction of line level details will be done for initial 3 pages
•	There will no integration of AP TRAC with Case management solution i.e. Zoho desk. Any scenarios during invoice processing, WNS AP user will log a ticket and update same in AP TRAC. Follow up and tracking of ticket will be done outside AP TRAC system
•	As per initial discussion with DN, Logic for Due date calculation is defined in PS hence would not be part of AP TRAC 
•	Invoice routing to coding queue will be done at group level instead of individual level. It would be DN user responsibility for clearing of coding cases and same will be tracked manually outside AP TRAC through aging report
•	Invoice line level validation will not be a part of validation stage by WNS AP users. Depending upon the extraction the data will be available at Coding stage for coder to verify before distributing accounting segments at line level. Any error / missing details at line level to be updated / rectified by Coder manually referring invoice image 
•	Manual master for GL coding, Approval, Escalation process will be provided by DN manually as per monthly basis. The SPOC from DN side will be identified and communicated to WNS post finalization of Organization structure of DN
•	Vendor Statement reconciliation will be done outside WNS AP TRAC. Any document identified as statement in TRAC will be downloaded by AP user to perform reconciliation comparing data with PS
•	The frequency of Inbound / Outbound files, naming convention is subject to change as per technical design
•	Screens / Prototypes updated in the document is for reference purpose however same is subject to change with actual UI keeping functionality AS-IS
•	DN will provide list of users as per operating unit level who will perform coding in AP TRAC. User details will be provided as per agreed WNS format
•	WNS SFTP will be used for integration between WNS AP, PeopleSoft and AWS. All inbound and outbound interfaces will be done through WNS SFTP
•	It has been agreed with DN IT Team that, AWS local storage will be provision for download invoice documents and provision to WNS SFTP. Such documents will be further introduced into TRAC after splitting
•	Post successful processing of invoice in AP TRAC, the outbound file will be placed in WNS SFTP folder which will further pull by PeopleSoft for posting. The pulling mechanism will be developed by IBM team
•	Invoice images will be pulled by AWS from WNS SFTP folder. The pulling mechanism will be developed by DN AWS team WNS Operation users will have access to PeopleSoft system to handle issues / fallout cases. The level of access to be decided and confirm by DN
•	Reports discussion is still ON with WNS Operations team. Same will be taken up with DN post finalization of fields and logic for review and sign-off separately
•	File naming convention and master data column names subject to change during technical design
•	As per discussion there will be no priority flag in AP TRAC as all invoices will be treated the same as they are received (FIFO method).  
•	If a rush payment is requested by a Delaware North associate or Vendor (with approval from Delaware North), then payments terms will be updated in the ERP to ensure payments are picked up in the following pay cycle. Hence handling of RUSH Payment will be out of AP TRAC.
•	AP TRAC number field will be available in PeopleSoft for a unique reference between PeopleSoft and AP TRAC
•	There will no acknowledgement from PS for Pre-edit errors. Such errors will be handle in PS either by WNS / DN Retained group
•	There will no report from AP TRAC for pre-edit errors since no acknowledgement
•	There will be manual dependency to check for pre-edit error by running report by WNS and inform DN retained services team outside AP TRAC
•	For voucher build error, though there will be acknowledgement for all cases into WNS AP TRAC. Depending upon error type, rectification will be done either in PS directly by WNS / DN retained services group or it will be reprocessed in AP TRAC for generating new invoice file
•	Deletion of invoice / vouchers will be done in PS as per error type for such cases, new voucher number will be provision in acknowledgement file and same will be updated in AP TRAC
•	The Analysis Type (GLE) and Category (e.g., Profit Generating) are setup in PeopleSoft configuration and will not need to be configured in AP TRAC.

15	BRD ATTACHMENT                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                               
BRD for NON-PO Invoice Processing in AP TRAC
Click here to view the BRD              

16	RICEF RELATIONSHIP WITH FDD SECTIONS





















































































































































































































































RICEFW ID	RICEFW Title	RIFCEFW Description	Workstream	Application	Module	RICEFW Type	FDD Section 
I-003	Email/AWS to WNS OCR	Supplier email invoice from AWS to WNS OCR for image capture and invoice creation	P2P	WNS	 	Interface	3.3
I-012	WNS Images to AWS	Interface Invoice images to AWS for image storage	P2P	WNS	 	Interface	3.12
R-006	Invoice Escalation Aging Report	Provides a listing of invoices in AP Track that have not been approved after XX number of days	P2P	WNS	AP	Report	3.9
I-032	RICOH to WNS AP TRAC for Invoice Images	Process the Invoices received from RICOH which is paper based invoices sent by DN Vendors to a Physical PO Box.	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Interface	3.2
CF-01	OCR Extraction and Invoice Template Configuration	Configure the invoice templates for with data needed for extraction that will be fed into AP TRAC workflow 	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Configuration	3.5
E-004	AP Track Invoice Entry Validation 	First level data check of invoice data and provision to raise general exception before moving to processing queue	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Enhancement	3.6
W-001	Invoice workflow exception management and routing	Provides the ability to route invoices exceptions to different AP processor queues. For the following exceptions Hold, Cancel exception, Misc. document, Image quality and page count	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Workflow 	3.6 & 3.7
W-002	Approval routing based upon Accounting coding	Routing to DN Approver based upon distribution coding from DN coder	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Workflow 	3.9
E-006	Customization of Processing queue	Flexibility to change BU / org details, addition of exception for moving different queues	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Enhancement	3.7
CF-02	Invoice Approval Criteria	The approval logic is based on Invoice amount mapped to the User having the authorization	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Configuration	3.9
CF-03	Invoice Approval Routing 	Workflow logic for configuring approval process with escalation process in case of delay	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Configuration	3.9
CF-04	Workflow email routing and notification process	Workflow logic for configuring coding, approval process with notification for multiple reminders	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Configuration	3.8 & 3.9
CF-05	Re-validation of Invoice data - Quality check	Recheck of Data to confirm the Validation and Processing of data by the Users is correct	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Configuration	3.1
I-033	Merging Invoice and Supporting Documents	Merging multiple documents from AP TRAC into one to be shared with PeopleSoft for Import	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Interface	3.12
E-009	Error checking for Master and Invoice Data Integrations	Exception handling scenarios with respect to Interface acknowledgement and errors for inbound Master data (i.e., vendors, Chartfields) and outbound invoices that fail voucher load or voucher recycle.	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Enhancement	3.13 & 10.3
CF-06	DN and WNS user access levels and groups	Access level customization and configuration for Queue access by WNS and DN Users	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Configuration	7
R-007	Invoice Dashboard 	Configuration of report dashboard with respect to DN specific data points	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Report	11
R-008	AP Track Reconciliation Report	Development of reconciliation reports to fetch details of invoice processing activity from Introduction to voucher creation	P2P	WNS TRAC	AP	Report	11
Note – SLA report is not part of AP TRAC. Reports mentioned under section 11 will be available in TRAC. 
17	OPEN ITEM TRACKER WITH FDD SECTIONS
Attached is the list of Open items discussed during FDD Walkthrough Session
Click here to view Open Items Tracker  
18	STAKE HOLDERS
18.1	Delaware North Stakeholders
Below are the Delaware North Stakeholders who have been walked through this document in detail
Group	Person Name [Role]
Business Stake Holders	
IT Stakeholders	
	

18.2	WNS Stakeholders
Group	Person Name [Role]
Operations	
IT	
Capability	
	
	

19	APPROVAL SIGNATURE PAGE
Deliverable Name:          _____________________________________________
Version Number:             _____________________________________________
Project Name:                 _____________________________________________

I agree that this document represents my best understanding of the information presented within this Deliverable for this project today. Future changes in this baseline document can be made through the project’s defined change process. I realize that approved changes might require us to renegotiate the costs, resource and schedule commitments for this project.  

Name	Title	Signature / Electronic Vote / Email	Date
		<Approver Signature>	<Date Signed/Reviewed /Emailed>
		<Approver Signature>	<Date Signed/Reviewed /Emailed>
		<Approver Signature>	<Date Signed/Reviewed /Emailed>

